Hawaii statutes.
[§489E-17] Creation and retention of
electronic records and conversion of written records by governmental agencies.
Each governmental agency of this State shall determine whether, and the extent
to which, it will create and retain electronic records and convert written
records to electronic records. [L 2000, c 282, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next